Massachusetts, session 194th, H4999.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the first sentence in the second paragraph,
the following sentence:- The appropriate law enforcement agency responsible for notice to the
defendant shall notify the victim when a temporary or permanent abuse prevention order: (i) has
been successfully served; (ii) has not been successfully served within 12 hours of receipt of the
order from the court, and every 24 hours thereafter until service is complete or the court orders
otherwise, and the effect of non-service on the order’s validity; or (iii) has expired or otherwise
become ineffective.
SECTION 2. Section 9 of chapter 258E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting, after the first sentence in the second paragraph, the following sentence:
The appropriate law enforcement agency responsible for notice to the defendant shall notify the
victim when a temporary or permanent harassment prevention order: (i) has been successfully
served; (ii) has not been successfully served within 12 hours of receipt of the order from the
court, and every 24 hours thereafter until service is complete or the court orders otherwise, and
of 2

the effect of non-service on the order’s validity; or (iii) has expired or otherwise become
ineffective.
of 2